Missouri, session 2026, HB1963.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 337.600, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 337.600, to read as follows:
337.600. As used in sections 337.600 to 337.689, the following terms mean:
(1) "Advanced macro social worker", the applications of social work theory,
knowledge, methods, principles, values, and ethics; and the professional use of self to
community and organizational systems, systemic and macrocosm issues, and other indirect
nonclinical services; specialized knowledge and advanced practice skills in case management,
information and referral, nonclinical assessments, counseling, outcome evaluation, mediation,
nonclinical supervision, nonclinical consultation, expert testimony, education, outcome
evaluation, research, advocacy, social planning and policy development, community
organization, and the development, implementation and administration of policies,
programs, and activities. A licensed advanced macro social worker may not treat mental
or emotional disorders or provide psychotherapy without the direct supervision of a licensed
clinical social worker, or diagnose a mental disorder;
(2) "Clinical social work", the application of social work theory, knowledge, values,
methods, principles, and techniques of case work, group work, client-centered advocacy,
community organization, administration, planning, evaluation, consultation, research,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1963 2
psychotherapy and counseling methods and techniques to persons, families and groups in
assessment, diagnosis, treatment, prevention and amelioration of mental and emotional
conditions;
(3) "Committee", the state committee for social workers established in section
337.622;
(4) "Department", the Missouri department of commerce and insurance;
(5) "Director", the director of the division of professional registration;
(6) "Division", the division of professional registration;
(7) "Independent practice", any practice of social workers outside of an organized
setting such as a social, medical, or governmental agency in which a social worker assumes
responsibility and accountability for services required;
(8) "Licensed advanced macro social worker", any person who offers to render
services to individuals, groups, families, couples, organizations, institutions, communities,
government agencies, corporations, or the general public for a fee, monetary or otherwise,
implying that the person is trained, experienced, and licensed as an advanced macro social
worker, and who holds a current valid license to practice as an advanced macro social worker;
(9) "Licensed baccalaureate social worker", any person who offers to render services
to individuals, groups, organizations, institutions, corporations, government agencies, or the
general public for a fee, monetary or otherwise, implying that the person is trained,
experienced, and licensed as a baccalaureate social worker, and who holds a current valid
license to practice as a baccalaureate social worker;
(10) "Licensed clinical social worker", any person who offers to render services to
individuals, groups, organizations, institutions, corporations, government agencies, or the
general public for a fee, monetary or otherwise, implying that the person is trained,
experienced, and licensed as a clinical social worker, and who holds a current, valid license to
practice as a clinical social worker;
(11) "Licensed master social worker", any person who offers to render services to
individuals, groups, families, couples, organizations, institutions, communities, government
agencies, corporations, or the general public for a fee, monetary or otherwise, implying that
the person is trained, experienced, and licensed as a master social worker, and who holds a
current valid license to practice as a master social worker. A licensed master social worker
may not treat mental or emotional disorders, provide psychotherapy without the direct
supervision of a licensed clinical social worker, or diagnose a mental disorder;
(12) "Master social work", the application of social work theory, knowledge,
methods, and ethics and the professional use of self to restore or enhance social, psychosocial,
or biopsychosocial functioning of individuals, couples, families, groups, organizations,
communities, institutions, government agencies, or corporations. The practice includes the

HB 1963 3
applications of specialized knowledge and advanced practice skills in the areas of assessment,
treatment planning, implementation and evaluation, case management, mediation,
information and referral, counseling, client education, supervision, consultation, education,
research, advocacy, community organization and development, planning, evaluation,
implementation and administration of policies, programs, and activities. Under supervision
as provided in this section, the practice of master social work may include the practices
reserved to clinical social workers or advanced macro social workers for no more than forty-
eight consecutive calendar months for the purpose of obtaining licensure under section
337.615 or 337.645;
(13) "Practice of advanced macro social work", rendering, offering to render, or
supervising those who render to individuals, couples, families, groups, organizations,
institutions, corporations, government agencies, communities, or the general public any
service involving the application of methods, principles, and techniques of advanced practice
macro social work;
(14) "Practice of baccalaureate social work", rendering, offering to render, or
supervising those who render to individuals, families, groups, organizations, institutions,
corporations, or the general public any service involving the application of methods,
principles, and techniques of baccalaureate social work;
(15) "Practice of clinical social work", rendering, offering to render, or supervising
those who render to individuals, couples, groups, organizations, institutions, corporations, or
the general public any service involving the application of methods, principles, and
techniques of clinical social work;
(16) "Practice of master social work", rendering, offering to render, or supervising
those who render to individuals, couples, families, groups, organizations, institutions,
corporations, government agencies, communities, or the general public any service involving
the application of methods, principles, and techniques of master social work;
(17) "Qualified advanced macro supervisor", any licensed social worker who meets
the qualifications of a qualified clinical supervisor or a licensed advanced macro social
worker who has:
(a) Practiced in the field of social work as a licensed social worker for which he or
she is supervising the applicant for a minimum of [five] three years;
(b) Successfully completed a minimum of sixteen hours of supervisory training from
the Association of Social Work Boards, the National Association of Social Workers, an
accredited university, or a program approved by the state committee for social workers. All
organizations providing the supervisory training shall adhere to the basic content and quality
standards outlined by the state committee on social work; and

HB 1963 4
(c) Met all the requirements of sections 337.600 to 337.689, and as defined by rule by
the state committee for social workers;
(18) "Qualified baccalaureate supervisor", any licensed social worker who meets the
qualifications of a qualified clinical supervisor, qualified master supervisor, qualified
advanced macro supervisor, or a licensed baccalaureate social worker who has:
(a) Practiced in the field of social work as a licensed social worker for which he or
she is supervising the applicant for a minimum of [five] three years;
(b) Successfully completed a minimum of sixteen hours of supervisory training from
the Association of Social Work Boards, the National Association of Social Workers, an
accredited university, or a program approved by the state committee for social workers. All
organizations providing the supervisory training shall adhere to the basic content and quality
100 standards outlined by the state committee on social workers; and
101 (c) Met all the requirements of sections 337.600 to 337.689, and as defined by rule by
102 the state committee for social workers;
103 (19) "Qualified clinical supervisor", any licensed clinical social worker who has:
104 (a) Practiced in the field of social work as a licensed social worker for which he or
105 she is supervising the applicant for a minimum of [five] three years;
106 (b) Successfully completed a minimum of sixteen hours of supervisory training from
107 the Association of Social Work Boards, the National Association of Social Workers, an
108 accredited university, or a program approved by the state committee for social workers. All
109 organizations providing the supervisory training shall adhere to the basic content and quality
110 standards outlined by the state committee on social work; and
111 (c) Met all the requirements of sections 337.600 to 337.689, and as defined by rule by
112 the state committee for social workers;
113 (20) "Social worker", any individual that has:
114 (a) Received a baccalaureate degree in social work from an accredited social work
115 program approved by the Council on Social Work Education;
116 (b) Received a master's degree in social work from a social work program:
117 a. Accredited by the Council on Social Work Education; or
118 b. Recognized and approved by the committee in accordance with rules adopted by
119 the committee under section 337.627 and in accordance with the procedure set forth in section
120 337.628;
121 (c) Received a doctorate or Ph.D. in social work; or
122 (d) A current social worker license as set forth in sections 337.600 to 337.689.
✔